District of Columbia statutes.
29A-241.01

Repealed

Incorporation; number of incorporators; election of officers; powers of body politic.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1301, ch. 854, §§ 701, 702
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(4), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-241.01.
1981 Ed., § 29-701.
1973 Ed., § 29-301.